Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-697
Act, how cited.

Sections 66-697 to 66-6,116 shall be known and may be cited as the Compressed Fuel Tax Act.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1121, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB846, § 15.